Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.281

Curriculum development and funding—Use of federal stimulus funding—Reports—Recognized programs of study under RCW 28B.50.273—Prioritization of workforce training programs.

(1) The state board shall work with the *leadership team, the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to jointly develop, by June 30, 2010, curricula and training programs, to include on-the-job training, classroom training, and safety and health training, for the development of the skills and qualifications identified by the department of commerce under **section 7 of this act.

(2) The board shall target a portion of any federal stimulus funding received to ensure commensurate capacity for high employer-demand programs of study developed under this section. To that end, the state board must coordinate with the department, the *leadership team, the workforce board, or another appropriate state agency in the application for and receipt of any funding that may be made available through the federal youthbuild program, workforce innovation and opportunity act, job corps, or other relevant federal programs.

(3) The board shall provide an interim report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2011, and a final report by December 1, 2013, detailing the effectiveness of, and any recommendations for improving, the worker training curricula and programs established in this section.

(4) Existing curricula and training programs or programs provided by community and technical colleges in the state developed under this section must be recognized as programs of study under RCW 28B.50.273.

(5) Subject to available funding, the board may grant enrollment priority to persons who qualify for a waiver under RCW 28B.15.522 and who enroll in curricula and training programs provided by community or technical colleges in the state that have been developed in accordance with this section.

(6) The college board may prioritize workforce training programs that lead to a credential, certificate, or degree in green economy jobs. For purposes of this section, green economy jobs include those in the primary industries of a green economy including clean energy, high-efficiency building, green transportation, and environmental protection. Prioritization efforts may include but are not limited to: (a) Prioritization of the use of high employer-demand funding for workforce training programs in green economy jobs, if the programs meet minimum criteria for identification as a high-demand program of study as defined by the state board for community and technical colleges, however any additional community and technical college high-demand funding authorized for the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium and thereafter may be subject to prioritization; (b) increased outreach efforts to public utilities, education, labor, government, and private industry to develop tailored, green job training programs; and (c) increased outreach efforts to target populations. Outreach efforts shall be conducted in partnership with local workforce development councils.

(7) The definitions in RCW 43.330.010 apply to this section and RCW 28B.50.282.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2009; 2017 c 39 s 1; 2009 c 536 s 9.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The leadership team was created in 2009 c 536 s 3, which was vetoed.

**(2) Section 7 of this act was vetoed.

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Short title—2009 c 536: See note following RCW 43.330.370.